Wisconsin, session 2025, SB899.
do enact as follows:SB899,11Section 1. 11.0101 (14m) of the statutes is created to read:SB899,2,2211.0101 (14m) “Foreign national” means any of the following:SB899,2,43(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not 4lawfully admitted for permanent residence, as defined in 8 USC 1101 (a) (20).SB899,2,55(b) A government of a foreign country.SB899,2,66(c) A foreign political party.SB899,2,97(d) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination 8of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a 9foreign country.SB899,3,710(e) An entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, or organization, 1having its principal place of business in the United States that is wholly or majority 2owned by any foreign national, as defined under pars. (a) to (d), unless any 3contribution or disbursement subject to this chapter made by the entity derives 4entirely from funds generated by the entity’s U.S. operations and all decisions 5concerning such contributions or disbursements are made by individuals who are 6U.S. citizens or individuals lawfully admitted for permanent residence, as defined 7in 8 USC 1101 (a) (20).SB899,28Section 2. 11.0101 (26m) of the statutes is created to read:SB899,3,12911.0101 (26m) “Preliminary activity” means activity occurring prior to filing 10a registration statement under s. 11.0803 and includes preparing and analyzing 11referendum language and ballot questions, conducting a poll, survey, or focus group, 12making communications, and travel.SB899,313Section 3. 11.0606 of the statutes is created to read:SB899,3,221411.0606 Foreign nationals; prohibited contributions. (1) 15Affirmations. Each independent expenditure committee or sponsoring 16organization of an independent expenditure committee shall obtain from a person 17making a contribution to the independent expenditure committee or providing 18funds to the sponsoring organization a written affirmation that the person is not a 19foreign national and has not intentionally accepted funds aggregating in excess of 20$100,000 from one or more foreign nationals during the 4-year period immediately 21preceding the date on which the person makes the contribution or provides the 22funds. SB899,4,923(2) Reports. For each report required under s. 11.0604, an independent 24expenditure committee that makes a disbursement, expenditure, or contribution to 1support or defeat a referendum, or to influence a particular vote at a referendum, 2shall attest that the committee and its sponsoring organization has obtained all the 3written affirmations under sub. (1) for all contributions and funds accepted by the 4committee or sponsoring organization and the committee shall affirm that neither 5it nor its sponsoring organization have intentionally received, solicited, or accepted, 6directly or indirectly, contributions or funds aggregating in excess of $100,000 from 7one or more foreign nationals during the 4-year period immediately preceding the 8date on which the committee makes a disbursement, expenditure, or contribution 9and will not do so on or prior to the date of the referendum.SB899,410Section 4. 11.0803 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB899,4,121111.0803 (1) (e) An affirmation that none of the referendum committee’s 12preliminary activity was funded, directly or indirectly, by a foreign national.SB899,513Section 5. 11.0805 of the statutes is created to read:SB899,4,191411.0805 Foreign nationals; prohibited contributions. (1) 15Affirmations. Each referendum committee shall obtain from a person making a 16contribution to the referendum committee a written affirmation that the person is 17not a foreign national and has not intentionally accepted funds aggregating in 18excess of $100,000 from one or more foreign nationals during the 4-year period 19immediately preceding the date on which the person makes the contribution. SB899,5,220(2) Reports. For each report required under s. 11.0804, a referendum 21committee shall attest that it has obtained all the written affirmations under sub. 22(1) for all contributions accepted by the committee and the committee shall affirm 23that it has not intentionally received, solicited, or accepted, directly or indirectly, 24contributions aggregating in excess of $100,000 from one or more foreign nationals 1during the 4-year period immediately preceding the date on which the committee 2accepts a contribution and will not do so on or prior to the date of the referendum.SB899,63Section 6. 11.1208 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 11.1208 (4) (a).SB899,74Section 7. 11.1208 (4) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB899,5,8511.1208 (4) (b) 1. No foreign national may, directly or indirectly, make a 6contribution to a referendum committee and no referendum committee may, 7directly or indirectly, receive, solicit, or accept a contribution from a foreign 8national.SB899,5,1292. No foreign national may direct, dictate, control, or directly or indirectly 10participate in the decision-making process of any person regarding the person’s 11activities to support or oppose a referendum or to influence a particular vote at a 12referendum.SB899,5,15133. No foreign national may solicit, directly or indirectly, the making of a 14donation, contribution, or expenditure by another person to influence a 15referendum.SB899,5,1616